Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2329XS (2) 91 cm/jh S.F. 241 Section 1. Section 598.1, subsection 8, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 8. âPostsecondary education subsidyâ means an amount which 3 either of the parties may be required to pay under a temporary 4 order or final judgment or decree for educational expenses of 5 a child who is between the ages of eighteen and twenty-two 6 years if the child is regularly attending a course of career 7 and technical training either as a part of a regular school 8 program or under special arrangements adapted to the individual 9 personâs needs; or is, in good faith, a full-time student in a 10 college, university, or community college; or has been accepted 11 for admission to a college, university, or community college 12 and the next regular term has not yet begun. 13 Sec. 2. Section 598.21F, Code 2025, is amended by striking 14 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 15 598.21F Postsecondary education subsidy. 16 The court shall not order either of the parties to pay a 17 postsecondary education subsidy under a temporary order or 18 final judgment or decree. 19 Sec. 3. Section 598.22, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 5. Prompt payment of sums required to be paid under sections 22 598.10 , 598.21A , 598.21B , 598.21C , and 598.21E , and 598.21F is 23 the essence of such orders or judgments and the court may act 24 pursuant to section 598.23 regardless of whether the amounts in 25 default are paid prior to the contempt hearing. 26 Sec. 4. Section 600.11, subsection 2, paragraph a, 27 subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 28 (5) A person who is ordered to pay support or a 29 postsecondary education subsidy pursuant to section 598.21F , or 30 chapter 234 , 252A , 252C , 252F , 598 , 600B , or any other chapter 31 of the Code, for a person eighteen years of age or older who is 32 being adopted by a stepparent, and the support order or order 33 requires payment of support or postsecondary education subsidy 34 for any period of time after the child reaches eighteen years 35 -1- LSB 2329XS (2) 91 cm/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 241 of age. 1 Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to a support order, 2 decree, or judgment entered or pending on or after July 1, 3 2025. This Act shall not be the basis for modification of an 4 order, decree, or judgment entered before July 1, 2025, that 5 provides for a postsecondary education subsidy. 6